Tennessee, session 114, HB0211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 54-2-202(a), is amended by deleting
the language "Prior to January 1, 2024, and prior to each January 1 thereafter" and substituting
instead the language "Prior to each January 15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0211
000127
- 1 -